West Virginia, session 2026, SB356.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Osteopathic Medicine. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-14-14 of this code, modified by the Board of Osteopathic Medicine to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 9, 2025, relating to the Board of Osteopathic Medicine (osteopathic physician assistants, 24 CSR 02), is authorized.